Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 30. Titles and Interests
38-30-162.
Interests and instruments to which sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164 do not apply.

Sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164 shall not affect any special limitation or possibility of reverter or condition subsequent or right of entry contained in any conveyance, devise, or appointment for a public, charitable, religious, or educational purpose.

Sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164 shall not affect any special limitation or possibility of reverter or condition subsequent or right of entry created with respect to any:

Lease;

Mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien to secure a debt;

Communication, transmission or transportation line, or pipeline, railroad, or public road;

Easement or right-of-way; or

Reservation or lease of or conveyance, devise, or appointment of any interest in any oil, gas, or other minerals or right to take oil, gas, or other minerals, or of any interest in water or water rights.

If any instrument includes any interest in real property in addition to one set forth in subsection (2) of this section, sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164 shall apply to such other interest in real property, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 941, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-62.

38-30-163.
Other statutes and laws remain applicable.

Sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164 shall not be construed as establishing or maintaining or reviving the validity of any special limitation or possibility of reverter or condition subsequent or right of entry which becomes barred by any other statute or any other law, or which is for any reason unenforceable, or which for any reason has ceased to exist; nor shall it be construed as excusing, or extending the period for, the bringing of any action or the doing of any other act necessary, under any other statute or any other law, to establish or maintain the validity or enforceability of any special limitation or possibility of reverter or condition subsequent or right of entry.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 942, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-63.

38-30-164.
Sections to be liberally construed.

Sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-164 shall be liberally construed to effect the legislative purposes of simplifying and facilitating real property title transactions and of rendering real property titles more secure and marketable by the elimination, as provided in sections 38-30-157 to 38-30-163, of purported special limitations, and possibilities of reverter, and conditions subsequent, and rights of entry.

History.

Source:
L. 65:

P. 942, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-64.

38-30-165.
Unreasonable restraints on the alienation of property - prohibited practices.

Subject to the limitations and exceptions as provided in this section, any person with a security interest in real estate shall not, directly or indirectly:

Accelerate or mature the indebtedness secured by such real estate on account of the sale or transfer of such real estate or on account of the assumption of such indebtedness; except that this paragraph (a) shall not apply if the person to whom the real estate would be sold or transferred is reasonably determined by the person holding the security interest to be financially incapable of retiring the indebtedness according to its terms, based upon standards normally used by persons in the business of making loans on real estate in the same or similar circumstances; or

Increase the interest rate more than one percent per annum above the existing interest rate of the indebtedness or otherwise modify, for the benefit of the holder of the security interest, the terms and conditions of the indebtedness secured by such real estate, on account of the sale or transfer of such real estate or on account of the assumption of such indebtedness; or

Charge, collect, or attempt to collect any fee in excess of one-half of one percent of the principal amount of the indebtedness outstanding, on account of the sale or transfer of such real estate or on account of the assumption of such indebtedness, not including title insurance, abstracting, credit report, survey, or other charges appertaining to the sale; or

Enforce or attempt to enforce the provisions of any mortgage, deed of trust, or other real estate security instrument executed on or after July 1, 1975, which provisions are contrary to this section; but this section shall not be applicable to instruments executed prior to July 1, 1975, nor to the rights, duties, or interests flowing therefrom.

The maximum increase allowed in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section and the maximum fee allowed in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed required, minimum, or ordinary, but said interest increase and fee may, in any case, be less than the amount allowed.

This section shall be applicable only to a security interest in real property utilized as residential dwelling units other than motels, hotels, and nursing homes.

This section shall not be applicable in those cases in which the secretary of the department of housing and urban development, or his successor, matures the indebtedness on multiple-family housing projects pursuant to the current law and regulations of the federal housing administration.

This section shall not be applicable to a person with a security interest in real estate who is not regularly engaged in the business of making real estate loans.

In the event that the party assuming the indebtedness declines to agree to an increase in the interest rate as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, said indebtedness may be prepaid without penalty or increased interest at any time within sixty days after said assumption; but if he does not make such prepayment within the sixty-day period he shall be liable for the increased interest rate from the date of the assumption, and any prepayment penalty provided for in the security instrument shall thereafter be in effect.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in cases of mortgage loans made on or after January 1, 1981, with proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to article 3 of title 29, C.R.S.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to indebtedness made or acquired by the Colorado housing and finance authority on or after April 1, 1981, secured by real estate, when said authority accelerates or matures, or requires or permits the acceleration or maturing of, indebtedness secured by real estate or when said authority increases, or requires or permits the increase of, the interest rate more than one percent per annum above the existing rate of the indebtedness in accordance with regulations of the Colorado housing and finance authority.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1428, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1)(c) amended, p. 315, § 70, effective May 20.

L. 81:

(8) added, p. 1827, § 1, effective April 2; (7) added, p. 1826, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 87:

(8) amended, p. 1197, § 20, effective May 20.

38-30-166.
Joint ventures - ownership and transfer of property.

Upon compliance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a joint venture may acquire, convey, encumber, lease, or otherwise deal with any interest in property in the name of the joint venture set forth in the affidavit required by subsection (2) of this section and may do so regardless of whether the affidavit is recorded before or after the conveyance to the joint venture is recorded. The provisions of this subsection (1) shall apply to any interest in property acquired in the name of a joint venture either before or after August 8, 2001.

Any member of a joint venture may record with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the interest in property is located an affidavit setting forth the following:

A statement that the affidavit relates to a joint venture;

The name of the joint venture; and

The names and addresses of all of the joint venturers of the joint venture.

The affidavit may set forth a statement that fewer than all of the joint venturers are authorized to act on behalf of the joint venture in any acquisition, conveyance, encumbrance, lease, or other dealing with an interest in property in the name of the joint venture. If such a statement is included, the affidavit:

Shall designate the joint venturers or the manner of designating the joint venturers so authorized;

May express such limitations upon the authority of such joint venturers as may exist; and

Shall be executed by all of the joint venturers named in the affidavit as set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

If the affidavit does not contain a statement as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the affidavit shall be executed by at least one joint venturer named in the affidavit.

Upon recording, the affidavit shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts recited therein, the authority of the affiant to execute and record the affidavit, and the authority of the joint venturers who are thereby empowered to convey or otherwise act on behalf of the joint venture, insofar as the same affect title to any interest in property.

This subsection (3) shall apply only to a joint venture that has recorded an affidavit pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. Where an interest in property is held in the name of a joint venture, such interest shall only be conveyed, encumbered, leased, or otherwise dealt with in the name of such joint venture by an instrument executed by all of the joint venturers named in the affidavit; except that, if the affidavit sets forth a statement as provided for in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, the joint venturers designated in such statement or designated in the manner provided in such statement may act in accordance with the statement with respect to such interest in property.

This subsection (4) shall only apply to a joint venture that has recorded an affidavit pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. A lien or encumbrance arising out of a claim against a joint venturer may attach to the joint venturer’s interest in the joint venture and to the separate property of the joint venturer but shall not attach to any property of the joint venture or any property or interest of any other joint venturer. A lien or encumbrance arising out of a claim against a joint venture may attach to the property of the joint venture. A lien or encumbrance arising out of a claim against a joint venture and a joint venturer may attach to the property of the joint venture, to the joint venturer’s interest in the joint venture, and to the separate property of the joint venturer. On due application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a joint venturer, the court may charge such interest of such joint venturer with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment, and with interest thereon, and may then or later appoint a receiver of distributions in respect of such interest.

For the purposes of this section, the term “joint venture” does not include a partnership, as defined in the “Uniform Partnership Law”, article 60 of title 7, C.R.S., or the “Colorado Uniform Partnership Act (1997)”, article 64 of title 7, C.R.S., whether or not denominated a joint venture in its organizational documents or elsewhere. Except with respect to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, as applied to any lien or encumbrance arising out of a claim by a joint venturer against another joint venturer in the joint venture, or against the joint venture itself, the provisions of this section shall not be interpreted to alter or affect the rights and duties between joint venturers of a joint venture, as may be required by law or by court decision.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2001, p. 400, § 4, effective August 8, 2001.)

History.

Source:
L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1714, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2122, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 97:

(5) amended, p. 919, § 17, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2001:

(1), (2), (3), and (6) amended, p. 400, § 4, effective August 8.

38-30-167.
Right of purchaser to obtain partial specific performance.

If it is impossible for a vendor of real property to convey a portion of the real property he contracted to convey, the vendee has a right to obtain a conveyance of that portion which it is possible to convey and a right to obtain damages or other equitable relief concerning the portion which it is impossible to convey. For the purposes of this section, “vendor” includes an optionor or a grantor of a right to repurchase or lease, and “vendee” includes an optionee or a holder of a right to repurchase or lease.

History.

Source:
L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1394, § 1, effective July 1.

38-30-168.
Unreasonable restrictions on renewable energy generation devices - definitions.

A covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation or use of a renewable energy generation device is void and unenforceable.

As used in this section, “renewable energy generation device” means either:

A solar energy device, as defined in section 38-32.5-100.3; or

A wind-electric generator that meets the interconnection standards established in rules promulgated by the public utilities commission pursuant to section 40-2-124, C.R.S.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

Aesthetic provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on the dimensions, placement, or external appearance of a renewable energy generation device and that do not:

Increase the cost of the device by more than ten percent;

Decrease the performance or efficiency of the device by more than ten percent; or

Require a period of review and approval that exceeds sixty days after the date of application. If an application for installation of a renewable energy generation device is not denied or returned for modifications within sixty days, it is deemed approved. The review process must be transparent; denial of approval must not be arbitrary or capricious; and the basis for any denial must be described in reasonable detail.

This subsection (2)(a), as amended by House Bill 21-1229, enacted in 2021, does not apply to an association that includes time share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

Bona fide safety requirements, required by an applicable building code or recognized electrical safety standard, for the protection of persons and property; or

Reasonable restrictions on the installation and use of wind-electric generators to reduce interference with the use and enjoyment by residents of property situated near wind-electric generators as a result of the sound associated with the wind-electric generators. Interference with the use and enjoyment of property by residents for the purpose of determining whether a restriction is reasonable shall be determined as a part of the architectural review process as required by the governing documents of the common interest community and shall include consideration of input by the individuals requesting approval from the common interest community to install a wind-electric generator.

This section shall not be construed to confer upon any property owner the right to place a renewable energy generation device on property that is:

Owned by another person;

Leased, except with permission of the lessor;

Collateral for a commercial loan, except with permission of the secured party; or

A limited common element or general common element of a common interest community.

In any litigation involving the significance of an increase in cost of a renewable energy generation device, for purposes of subparagraph (I) of paragraph

of subsection (2) of this section, the party that prevails on the issue of the significance of the increase shall be entitled to its reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in litigating that issue. This subsection (4) shall not be construed to limit or prohibit an award of attorney fees or costs on other grounds or in connection with other issues.

History.

Source:
L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1396, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 617, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended,(HB 21-1229), ch. 409, p. 2708, § 2, effective September 7.

Editor’s note:

Section 5 of chapter 409 (HB 21-1229), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after September 7, 2021.

38-30-169.
Instruments of conveyance - removal of void and unenforceable restrictive covenants which are based upon race or religion.

Any attorney, title insurance company, or title insurance agent authorized to do business in this state may remove by recording a new instrument any restrictive covenants which are based upon race or religion, or reference thereto, which are contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property and which:

Are held to be void and unenforceable by final determination of the supreme court of the state of Colorado or the supreme court of the United States; or

Have been modified pursuant to the procedures specified in section 38-30-170.

Restrictive covenants which are based upon race or religion may be removed from such documents pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only upon the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property subject to such restrictive covenants which occurs subsequent to such final judicial determination or modification specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person who, in good faith and in the usual course of business, delivers any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property which contains any restrictive covenants which are based upon race or religion, or reference thereto, which are void and unenforceable by law shall be immune from civil liability. In addition, such delivery shall not constitute an unfair housing practice as specified in section 24-34-502 (1)(c), C.R.S. The provisions of this subsection (3) shall not apply to any person who:

Represents or attempts to represent that such restrictive covenants which are based upon race or religion are valid and enforceable; or

Honors or exercises or attempts to honor or exercise such restrictive covenants which are based upon race or religion.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1645, § 1, effective April 16.

38-30-170.
Private restrictive covenants - modification - exception - procedures.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), any private restrictive covenants which are held to be void and unenforceable by final determination of the supreme court of the state of Colorado or the supreme court of the United States may be modified pursuant to the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any private restrictive covenants which contain any express and written provisions concerning the modification of such private restrictive covenants.

Upon good faith delivery of written notification to all owners of real property located within a subdivision, as indicated on the records of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the subdivision is located, a meeting may be held not less than ten days after such notification has been given concerning the modification of any void and unenforceable private restrictive covenants. Such private restrictive covenants may be modified only upon the written approval of a majority of all of the owners of real property located within the subdivision. Following such approval, such private restrictive covenants, as modified, shall be filed for recording with such county clerk and recorder. A copy of such private restrictive covenants, as modified, shall be delivered by mail to all owners of record of real property located within the subdivision.

The county clerk and recorder shall not be held liable for recording any private restrictive covenants, as modified pursuant to the provisions of this section, which were filed for recording with such county clerk and recorder.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Modify” means to amend, terminate, remove, or cancel.

“Private restrictive covenant” means any covenant, restriction, or condition included in the subdivision plat or in any recorded document, or any amendment thereto, which is based upon race or religion and which is applicable to real property located within such subdivision, but does not include any covenant, restriction, or condition imposed on such real property by any governmental entity.

“Subdivision” means any parcel of land which is to be used for condominiums, apartments, or any other multiple-dwelling units or which is divided into two or more lots, parcels, or other divisions of land and for which a plat of such land has been filed for recording with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such land is located.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1645, § 1, effective April 16.

38-30-171.
Survival of remedies and title to corporate property after dissolution.

This section shall apply to corporations for profit that were both formed under the laws of this state and dissolved before July 1, 1994.

The dissolution of a corporation shall not eliminate or impair any remedy available to or against the corporation or its directors, officers, or shareholders for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such dissolution if an action or other proceeding is commenced thereon within two years after the date of the dissolution. The foregoing limitation shall not apply to any action affecting title to real estate. Any action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The shareholders, directors, and officers of the corporation shall have power to take such corporate and other action as shall be necessary or appropriate to effect any remedy available to the corporation, pursue any action or proceeding by the corporation, or defend against any action or proceeding against the corporation.

After dissolution of the corporation, title to any property of the corporation not previously distributed or disposed of by the corporation shall remain in the corporation. The majority of the surviving members of the last acting board of directors as named in the files of the secretary of state shall have full power and authority:

To sue and be sued in the corporate name and, for purposes of suit against such corporation, each director is an agent for process; and

To act on behalf of and in the name of such corporation to convey and dispose of any corporate property not distributed or disposed of in the dissolution.

Final disposition of such property shall be made by the majority of the surviving directors in the manner provided by law at the time of dissolution of such corporation. Upon the death of the last survivor of such directors, the public trustee of the county in which property owned by such corporation is situated shall have full power and authority to act on behalf of and in the name of such corporation to convey and dispose of such property.

History.

Source:
L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1329, § 52, effective June 1.

38-30-172.
Evidence of existence and authority - definitions.

Prima facie evidence of the existence of an entity and the authority of one or more persons to act on behalf of an entity to convey, encumber, or otherwise affect title to real property may be shown as provided in this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Entity” means a person as defined in section 2-4-401, C.R.S., other than an individual, capable of holding title to real property.

“Entity description” means the type of entity and may also include the name of the state, country, or other governmental authority under whose laws it was formed.

“Recorded” means recorded with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the real property is situated.

“Statement of authority” means an instrument executed on behalf of the entity that contains:

The name of the entity;

The type of entity and the state, country, or other governmental authority under whose laws it was formed;

A mailing address for the entity; and

The name or position of the person authorized to execute instruments conveying, encumbering, or otherwise affecting title to real property on behalf of the entity.

Prima facie evidence of the existence of an entity that executed a recorded instrument purporting to convey, encumber, or otherwise affect title to real property may be shown by any one or more of the following recorded instruments:

The instrument itself, if that instrument uses the same name and the same entity description, if any, as appeared in the instrument by which the entity purported to acquire title to the real property or any part thereof or any interest therein; or

Another instrument that is required by law to be recorded to enable the entity to hold or convey title to real property; or

Another instrument that is permitted by law to be recorded, that names the entity and gives the entity description of the entity and, that by law is prima facie evidence of the facts recited in the instrument insofar as such facts affect title to real property.

Prima facie evidence of the authority of the person that executed an instrument on behalf of an entity purporting to convey, encumber, or otherwise affect title to real property may be shown by any one or more of the following recorded instruments:

An instrument that is required or permitted by law to be recorded in order to evidence the authority of one or more persons by name or by position to execute instruments conveying, encumbering, or otherwise affecting title to real property on behalf of the entity; or

A certified copy of an instrument on file with any agency or department of any state, country, or other governmental authority that evidences the authority of one or more persons by name or by position to execute instruments conveying, encumbering, or otherwise affecting title to real property on behalf of the entity; or

A statement of authority.

A statement of authority may contain any limitation as may exist upon the authority of the person named in the statement or holding the position described in the statement to bind the entity and any other matters concerning the manner in which the entity deals with any interest in real property. Upon recording, a statement of authority shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts recited in the statement of authority insofar as the facts affect title to real property and prima facie evidence of the authority of the person executing the statement of authority to execute and record the statement of authority on behalf of the entity.

Any recorded instrument described in subsection (4) of this section may be amended or superseded by the recording of a subsequent instrument of the type described in subsection (4) of this section. The absence of any limitation described in subsection (5) of this section in a recorded instrument described in subsection (4) of this section shall be prima facie evidence that no such limitations exist.

History.

Source:
L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1525, § 23, effective June 3.

L. 98:

IP(3), IP(4), and (5) amended, p. 627, § 39, effective July 1.

38-30-173.
Survival of remedies and title to corporate property after dissolution - nonprofit corporations.

This section shall apply to nonprofit corporations that were dissolved before July 1, 1998, and either formed under articles 20 to 29 of title 7, C.R.S., or elected or could have elected to accept such articles as set forth in articles 20 to 29 of title 7, C.R.S.; except that this section shall not apply to any corporation that was dissolved by operation of law before July 1, 1998, as a consequence of the suspension of such corporation and was eligible for reinstatement or restoration, renewal, and revival on June 30, 1998.

The dissolution of a corporation shall not eliminate or impair any remedy available to or against the corporation or its directors, officers, or members for any right or claim existing on dissolution or any liability incurred prior to such dissolution if an action or other proceeding is commenced within two years after the date of the dissolution; except that this subsection (2) shall not apply to any action affecting the title to real estate. Any action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The members, directors, and officers of the corporation shall have the power to take such corporate and other action as shall be necessary or appropriate to effect any remedy available to the corporation, or defend any action or proceeding against the corporation.

After dissolution of the corporation, title to any property of the corporation not previously distributed or disposed of by the corporation shall remain in the corporation. The majority of the surviving members of the last acting board of directors as named in the files of the secretary of state shall have the power and ability to:

Sue and be sued in the corporate name, and, for purposes of suit against such corporation, each director is an agent for service of process; and

Act on behalf of and in the name of such corporation to convey and dispose of any corporate property not distributed or disposed of in the dissolution.

Final disposition of such property shall be made by the majority of the surviving directors in the manner provided by law at the time of the dissolution of the corporation. On the date of the death of the last survivor of the directors, the public trustee of the county in which the property owned by such corporation is situated shall have the power and authority to act on behalf of and in the name of such corporation to convey and dispose of the property.

History.

Source:
L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 627, § 40, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

(1) Articles 20 to 29 of title 7, referenced in subsection (1), were repealed, effective July 1, 1998.

(2) Current provisions concerning nonprofit corporations are located in articles 121 to 137 of title 7.